test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kuulj38_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kuulʼ: # Noun (38) kuulʼ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kuulʼ+N+Sg+Nom: kuulʼ
     kuulʼ+N+Sg+Gen: kooli
     kuulʼ+N+Sg+Par: kuuli
     kuulʼ+N+Sg+Ill: kuuli
     kuulʼ+N+Sg+Ine: [koolin, koolih, koolihn]
     kuulʼ+N+Sg+Ela: koolist
     kuulʼ+N+Sg+All: koolilõ
     kuulʼ+N+Sg+Ade: koolil
     kuulʼ+N+Sg+Abl: koolilt
     kuulʼ+N+Sg+Tra: koolis
     kuulʼ+N+Sg+Ter: kooliniq
     kuulʼ+N+Sg+Abe: koolildaq
     kuulʼ+N+Sg+Com: kooligaq
     kuulʼ+N+Pl+Nom: kooliq
     kuulʼ+N+Pl+Gen: kuulõ
     kuulʼ+N+Pl+Par: kuulõ
     kuulʼ+N+Pl+Ill: [kuulõhe, kuulõ, kuulõdõ]
     kuulʼ+N+Pl+Ine: [koolõn, koolõh, koolõhn]
     kuulʼ+N+Pl+Ela: koolõst
     kuulʼ+N+Pl+All: koolõlõ
     kuulʼ+N+Pl+Ade: koolõl
     kuulʼ+N+Pl+Abl: koolõlt
     kuulʼ+N+Pl+Tra: koolõs
     kuulʼ+N+Pl+Ter: koolõniq
     kuulʼ+N+Pl+Abe: koolõldaq
     kuulʼ+N+Pl+Com: kuulõgaq
